Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1809
Public entity, defined.

Public entity means a municipality, a registered group of municipalities, a public power district, a public power and irrigation district, an electric cooperative, an electric membership association, a joint entity formed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a joint public agency formed under the Joint Public Agency Act, an agency formed under the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, or any other governmental entity.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 9.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, see section 18-2401.